District of Columbia statutes.
38-1941

Repealed

Payment of salaries.

Repealed.

May 26, 1908, 35 Stat. 291, ch. 198, § 1
June 30, 1970, 84 Stat. 364, Pub. L. 91-297, title III, § 304(a)
Oct. 21, 1972, 86 Stat. 1012, Pub. L. 92-518, title I, § 104(a)
May 10, 1989, D.C. Law 7-231, § 30, 36 DCR 492
1981 Ed., § 31-1002.
1973 Ed., § 31-609.